New York, session 2025-2026, S3525.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 361 of the public 2 authorities law, as amended by chapter 621 of the laws of 1998, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) In addition to the powers conferred by the vehicle and traffic 5 law, the authority is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules and 6 regulations for the use and occupancy of the thruway as may be necessary 7 and proper for the public safety and convenience, for the preservation 8 of its property and for the collection of tolls and provided further 9 that the authority, in consultation with the departments of environ- 10 mental conservation and transportation, is hereby authorized to promul- 11 gate rules and regulations necessary to implement a heavy duty vehicle 12 roadside inspection program pursuant to section 19-0320 of the environ- 13 mental conservation law. Such rules and regulations shall authorize the 14 exemption from the collection of such tolls upon any New York state 15 resident who is a veteran and is certified by the United States veter- 16 ans' administration or the department of defense as entitled to receive 17 disability payments upon the certification of such administration or 18 department for a disability incurred by such veteran in time of war. 19 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 1630 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 20 amended by section 2 of subpart A of part ZZZ of chapter 59 of the laws 21 of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 22 4. Charging of tolls, taxes, fees, licenses or permits for the use of 23 the highway or any of its parts or entry into or remaining within the 24 central business district established by article forty-four-C of this EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01808-01-5 S. 3525 2 1 [chapter] title, where the imposition thereof is authorized by law. No 2 such toll shall be imposed by the New York state thruway authority upon 3 any New York state resident who is a veteran and is certified by the 4 United States veterans' administration or the department of defense as 5 entitled to receive disability payments upon the certification of such 6 administration or department for a disability incurred by such veteran 7 in time of war. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 9 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amend- 10 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 11 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 12 completed on or before such effective date.